California, session 20252026, SB647.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25665.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:25665.1. (a) (1) The commission shall establish the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program.(2) The Equitable Building Decarbonization Program includes the direct install program established pursuant to Section 25665.3 and the statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies established pursuant to Section 25665.5.(b) If moneys made available for the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program remain unspent after two years, the commission shall evaluate potential changes to the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program to increase participation and may make those unspent funds, or a portion of those unspent funds, available for other purposes consistent with the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program.(c) The commission shall establish a mechanism to notify applicants to the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program that they may also be eligible for building energy efficiency and decarbonization incentives authorized by the Public Utilities Commission.SEC. 2. Section 382.1 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:382.1. (a) There is hereby established a Low-Income Oversight Board that shall advise the commission on low-income electric, gas, and water customer issues and shall serve as a liaison for the commission to low-income ratepayers and representatives. The Low-Income Oversight Board shall replace the Low-Income Advisory Board in existence on January 1, 2000. The Low-Income Oversight Board shall do all of the following to advise the commission regarding the commission’s duties:(1) Monitor and evaluate implementation of all programs provided to low-income electricity, gas, and water customers.(2) Assist in the development and analysis of any assessments of low-income customer need.(3) Encourage collaboration between state and utility programs for low-income electricity and gas customers to maximize the leverage of state and federal energy efficiency funds to both lower the bills and increase the comfort of low-income customers.(4) Provide reports to the Legislature, as requested, summarizing the assessment of need, audits, and analysis of program implementation.(5) Assist in streamlining the application and enrollment process of programs for low-income electricity and gas customers with general low-income programs, including, but not limited to, the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service (ULTS) program and, including compliance with Section 739.1.(6) Encourage the usage of the network of community service providers in accordance with Section 381.5.(b) The Low-Income Oversight Board shall comprise 12 members to be selected as follows:(1) Five members selected by the commission who have expertise in the low-income community and who are not affiliated with any state agency or utility group. These members shall be selected in a manner to ensure an equitable geographic distribution.(2) One member selected by the Governor.(3) One member selected by the commission who is a commissioner or commissioner designee.(4) One member selected by the Department of Community Services and Development.(5) One member selected by the commission who is a representative of private weatherization contractors.(6) One member selected by the commission who is a representative of an electrical or gas corporation.(7) One member selected by the commission who is a representative of a water corporation.(8) One member selected by the Executive Director of the Energy Commission.(c) The Low-Income Oversight Board shall alternate meeting locations between northern, central, and southern California.(d) The Low-Income Oversight Board may establish a technical advisory committee consisting of low-income service providers, utility representatives, consumer organizations, and commission staff, to assist the board and may request utility representatives and commission staff to assist the technical advisory committee.(e) The commission shall do all of the following in conjunction with the board:(1) Work with the board, interested parties, and community-based organizations to increase participation in programs for low-income customers.(2) Provide technical support to the board.(3) Ensure that the energy burden of low-income electricity and gas customers is reduced.(4) Provide formal notice of board meetings in the commission’s daily calendar.(f) (1) Members of the board and members of the technical advisory committee shall be eligible for compensation in accordance with state guidelines for necessary travel.(2) Members of the board and members of the technical advisory committee who are not salaried state service employees shall be eligible for reasonable compensation for attendance at board meetings.(3) All reasonable costs incurred by the board in carrying out its duties pursuant to subdivision (a), including staffing, travel, and administrative costs, shall be reimbursed through the public utilities reimbursement account and shall be part of the budget of the commission and the commission shall consult with the board in the preparation of that portion of the commission’s annual proposed budget.